Hawaii statutes.
[§141-39]
Profits. The board shall forego any income or profit that licensees
lawfully obtain through the disposition of the licensees' industrial hemp crop;
provided that the licensee reports to the board, as required by this part:

(1) Any movement of the licensee's industrial hemp
plants, plant materials, or seeds outside the licensed growing area;

(2) Any sale of or benefit received in exchange for
the licensee's industrial hemp plants, plant materials, or seeds; and

(3) Any commercial details of such movement, sale, or
exchange for use by the board to research the marketability and logistical
production of industrial hemp in the State. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next